Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.005

Findings—Intent.

(1) The legislature finds the following:

(a) Washington has an existing infrastructure of world-class cancer research and care centers for children and adults that can develop and apply new techniques for the prevention of cancer and care of cancer patients throughout Washington;

(b) Sustained investment in cancer research, prevention, and care is critical to reducing long-term health costs, saving lives, and relieving pain and suffering;

(c) Promoting the health of state residents is a fundamental public purpose and governmental function. Action to promote cancer research and prevention to improve the quality of life of the people of Washington is consistent with this fundamental public purpose; and

(d) Additional public resources dedicated exclusively to cancer research will provide sustained investment in cancer research to the benefit of the people of Washington.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature in enacting chapter 34, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. to:

(a) Optimize the use of public funds by giving priority to research utilizing the best science and technology with the greatest potential to improve health outcomes;

(b) Increase the value of our public investments by leveraging our state's existing cancer research facilities and talent, as well as clinical and therapeutic resources;

(c) Incentivize additional investment by requiring private or other nonstate resources to match public funds;

(d) Protect and benefit Washington taxpayers by funding proposals for cancer research that are reviewed by an independent scientific panel;

(e) Require fiscal and public accountability through independent audits, open public meetings and hearings, and annual reports to the public; and

(f) Create jobs and encourage investments that will generate new tax revenues in our state, and advance the biotech, medical device, and health care information technology industries in Washington.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 34 s 1.]